Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2911
Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska State Historical Society and shall consist of all fees credited to the fund pursuant to section 77-2907. The fund shall be used to administer and enforce the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 160.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.